Colorado statutes. TITLE 29 Government - Local
ARTICLE 28
MEDICAL PROVIDER FEES

Section

29-28-101. Legislative declaration.

The general assembly finds and declares that:

Medicaid reimbursement rates cover only approximately sixty-five percent of the actual costs incurred by service providers rendering services to medicaid recipients;

Low medicaid reimbursement rates and increased caseloads have caused the costs to shift within the health-care delivery system, resulting in higher medical costs for the general population;

The medicaid caseload continues to expand and, therefore, the need for providers to serve these medicaid recipients continues to increase;

Rising health-care costs are a primary concern for Colorado citizens and businesses;

It is therefore in the best interest of the state of Colorado to authorize local governments to impose a fee on certain medical providers to assist in financing medicaid costs and the disproportionate share hospital payments for providing medical services to low-income populations.

Source:

L. 2006:

Entire article added, p. 885, § 1, effective May 5.

L. 2008:

(1)(e) amended, p. 928, § 2, effective May 20.

29-28-102. Definitions.

As used in this article, unless the context otherwise requires:

"Department" means the department of health care policy and financing.

"Local government" means a county, home rule county, home rule or statutory city, town, territorial charter city, or city and county.

(2.5) "Provider fee" means a licensing fee, assessment, or other mandatory payment that is related to health-care items or services as specified under 42 CFR 433.55.

"Qualified provider" means a hospital licensed pursuant to section 25-3-101, C.R.S., or a certified home health-care agency within the territorial boundaries of a local government.

(Deleted by amendment, L. 2008, p. 929, § 3, effective May 20, 2008.)

Source:

L. 2006:

Entire article added, p. 886, § 1, effective May 5.

L. 2008:

(2.5) added and (3) and (4) amended, p. 929, § 3, effective May 20.

29-28-103. Powers of governing body - medicaid provider fee authorization.

The governing body of a local government may impose a provider fee on health services provided by qualified providers for the purpose of obtaining federal financial participation under the state's medical assistance program, articles 4 to 6 of title 25.5, C.R.S., and the Colorado indigent care program, article 3 of title 25.5, C.R.S. The provider fee shall be used only to sustain or increase reimbursements for providing medical care under the state's medical assistance program and to low-income populations.

The amount of the provider fee may be based upon the aggregate gross or net revenue, as prescribed by the state department, or any other method allowable under federal law, of all qualified providers subject to the provider fee, and the amount of the provider fee shall not exceed the maximum amount allowed under federal law. The local government may exempt revenue categories from the gross or net revenue calculation and the collection of the provider fee from qualified providers, as authorized by state and federal medicaid rules and regulations.

Subject to state and federal medicaid rules and regulations, in any given year, a local government may elect to not assess the provider fee imposed on qualified providers pursuant to this subsection (1) and not make the reimbursements to qualified providers within its territorial boundaries for that year.

Prior to the imposition and collection of the provider fee, the governing body of the local government shall:

Approve the provider fee by ordinance or resolution; and

Notify the department that the local government has authorized the imposition of a provider fee pursuant to this subsection (1).

The local government shall either:

(I) Collect the provider fee imposed on qualified providers pursuant to subsection (1) of this section; or

(II) Direct the qualified providers within its jurisdiction to pay the provider fee imposed pursuant to subsection (1) of this section directly to the department.

If the local government elects to collect the provider fee imposed pursuant to subsection (1) of this section, the local government shall either:

Transfer the amount that the local government collects from the provider fee to the department, in which case the department shall distribute the provider fee and all federal financial participation received to the qualified providers within the territorial boundaries of the local government pursuant to section 25.5-4-417, C.R.S.; or

Distribute all moneys from the provider fee collected pursuant to this section and certify to the department the amount that the local government reimburses the qualified providers for providing medical care under the state's medical assistance program and to low-income populations, which shall include the distribution of moneys collected from the provider fee collected pursuant to this section. The local government may distribute any additional moneys eligible for federal financial participation to qualified providers within the territorial boundaries of the local government pursuant to section 25.5-4-417, C.R.S.

If the local government elects to direct the qualified providers to pay the provider fee imposed pursuant to subsection (1) of this section directly to the department, the department shall distribute the provider fee and all federal financial participation received to the qualified providers within the territorial boundaries of the local government pursuant to section 25.5-4-417, C.R.S.

All moneys received by the department pursuant to this subsection (2) shall be transmitted to the state treasurer, who shall credit the same to the local government provider fee cash fund, which fund is hereby created and referred to in this paragraph (d) as the "fund". The general assembly may make appropriations from the fund to the department for the department's administrative costs incurred in implementing this section. The department shall distribute the remaining moneys in the fund pursuant to this subsection (2). Any moneys in the fund not expended for the purpose of this section shall be invested by the state treasurer as provided by law. All interest and income derived from the investment and deposit of moneys in the fund shall be credited to the fund. Any unexpended and unencumbered moneys remaining in the fund at the end of a fiscal year shall remain in the fund and shall not be credited or transferred to the general fund or another fund.

Except for administrative costs of the department, provider fees imposed and distributed pursuant to this section from certified home health-care agencies and licensed hospitals within the territorial boundaries of a local government shall be kept separate to ensure that the provider fees collected from certified home health-care agencies within the territorial boundaries of the local government are distributed only to certified home health-care agencies and the provider fees collected from licensed hospitals within the territorial boundaries of the local government are distributed only to licensed hospitals.

A local government that elects to impose and collect a provider fee from qualified providers pursuant to this section shall follow all applicable state and federal medicaid rules and regulations regarding provider fees.

Source:

L. 2006:

Entire article added, p. 886, § 1, effective May 5.

L. 2008:

Entire section amended, p. 929, § 4, effective May 20.

L. 2010:

(2)(b)(II) amended, (HB 10-1422), ch. 419, p. 2118, § 162, effective August 11.